Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Rates and Services

281.675.
Standards of certificate holder’s rates and services. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 22; 1958, ch. 130, § 13; 1972, ch. 269, § 2; 1978, ch. 232, § 10, effective June 17, 1978; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.680.
Filing and public inspection of rate and service schedules and contracts — Collective ratemaking procedures. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 23; 1958, ch. 130, § 14; 1962, ch. 63, § 6; 1966, ch. 139, § 28; 1972, ch. 269, § 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1984, ch. 160, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1998, ch. 331, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.685.
Adherence to rates, fares, charges, and schedules — Prohibition against discrimination. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 24; 1958, ch. 130, § 15; 1998, ch. 331, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.687.
Vehicle license cost recovery fee charged by motor vehicle renting company.

As used in this section:

“Motor vehicle renting company” means a holder of a certificate as required under KRS

281.630

to operate as a U-Drive-It, which regularly engages in renting or leasing motor vehicles to customers for less than a sixty (60) day term as part of an established business;

“Vehicle license costs” means the costs incurred by a motor vehicle renting company for licensing, titling, registration, property tax, plating, and inspecting rental motor vehicles; and

“Vehicle license cost recovery fee” means a charge on a vehicle rental transaction originating within the Commonwealth that is separately stated on the rental agreement to recover vehicle license costs.

If a motor vehicle renting company includes a vehicle license cost recovery fee as a separately stated charge in a rental transaction, the amount of the fee shall represent the company’s good-faith estimate of the motor vehicle rental company’s daily charge to recover its actual total annual vehicle license costs.

If the total amount of the vehicle license cost recovery fees collected by a motor vehicle renting company under this section in any calendar year exceeds the company’s actual vehicle license costs, the motor vehicle renting company shall:

Retain the excess amount; and

Adjust the vehicle cost recovery fee for the following calendar year by a corresponding amount.

Nothing in this section shall prevent a motor vehicle renting company from including, or making adjustments during the calendar year to, separately stated surcharges, fees, or charges in the rental agreement, which may include but are not limited to vehicle license cost recovery fees, airport access fees, airport concession fees, consolidated facility charges, and all applicable taxes.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 88, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2015 ch. 19, § 17, effective June 24, 2015.

281.690.
Changes in rates. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 25; 1954, ch. 188, § 8; 1958, ch. 130, § 16; 1996, ch. 318, § 202, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 331, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.695.
Powers of Department of Vehicle Regulation to regulate rates and service. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 26; 1996, ch. 318, § 203, effective July 15, 1996; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.700.
Abandonment or change of route, service or schedule. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 27; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1978, ch. 232, § 12, effective June 17, 1978; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.705.
Accounts — Reports.

The department may prescribe uniform systems of accounts and the filing of reports by motor carriers.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 28.